Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 349 Coalbed Methane Development
349.040.
Prohibited drilling activities — Filing requirements for permit application — Appeal — Waiver — Filing of maps and plans — Denial of permit.

It is unlawful for any person to drill, commence, operate, deepen, convert, or stimulate any coalbed methane well, to conduct any horizontal drilling of a coalbed methane well or to convert any existing oil or natural gas well to a coalbed methane well, without first securing from the department a permit pursuant to this chapter. Before any well, borehole, or facility initially used for a coal mining related purpose, such as a vent hole, is converted for the purpose of recovering coalbed methane for sale or use, the operator shall obtain a permit and comply with the provisions of this chapter prior to the time that the well, borehole, or facility is converted or used for the purpose of recovering coalbed methane for sale or use. It is unlawful for any person to drill, deepen, convert, or reopen a coalbed methane well for the production of oil or natural gas or for the injection of water, gas, or other fluids into any oil or natural gas producing formation until the person has obtained a permit from the department for a petroleum or natural gas well pursuant to KRS

353.570

. However, no additional permit fee shall be required if the original permit for the coalbed methane well has not expired.

Every permit application filed under this section shall be verified and shall contain the following:

A statement that the applicant claims to have a valid real property interest in, or the current legal right to produce coalbed methane from a person claiming a valid real property interest in, the coalbed methane. The statement shall identify with specificity the nature of the real property interest and the document or instrument evidencing that interest or right, including recording information of any recorded document or instrument;

The names and addresses of the coalbed methane well operator and every person or entity whom the applicant must notify under any section of this chapter;

The name and address of each coal interest holder of any workable coalbed which is to be penetrated by a proposed coalbed methane well or within seven hundred fifty (750) horizontal feet or fifty (50) vertical feet of any portion of the proposed coalbed methane well;

The name and addresses of each record oil and gas lessee of, the record oil and gas lessor of, and the operator of all oil and gas formations from the surface to one hundred (100) feet below the deepest penetration of the coalbed methane well on the tract upon which the coalbed methane well is proposed to be located;

The coalbed methane well name or such other identification as the department may require;

The approximate depth to which the coalbed methane well is to be drilled, deepened, or converted, the coal seams including the depth and thickness of each seam that will be completed for production, and any other coal seams which will be penetrated by the coalbed methane well;

A description of any means to be used to stimulate any of the workable coalbeds penetrated by the coalbed methane well;

If the proposed coalbed methane well will require casing or tubing, the entire casing program for the coalbed methane well, including the size of each string of pipe, the starting point and depth to which each string is to be set, and the extent to which each string is to be cemented;

If the proposed operation is to convert an existing petroleum or natural gas well, as defined in KRS 353.010(19), or to convert a vertical borehole or facility initially used for a coal mining related purpose, such as a vent hole, to a coalbed methane well, all information required by this section, all formations from which production is anticipated, and any plans to plug any portion of the well;

Except for a vent hole proposed to be converted to a coalbed methane well, if the proposed coalbed methane well will be completed in some but not all coal seams for production, a plan and design for the coalbed methane well which will protect all workable coalbeds which will be penetrated by the coalbed methane well;

If the proposed operations will include horizontal drilling of a coalbed methane well, a description of the operations, including both the vertical and horizontal alignment and extent of the coalbed methane well from the surface to total depth; and

Other information as the department may require consistent with this chapter.

Each application for a coalbed methane well permit shall be accompanied by the following:

A permit application fee of three hundred dollars ($300);

A bond in an amount prescribed in KRS

349.120

;

A certificate that the applicant’s notice requirements of KRS

349.015

have been satisfied. Certification may be by affidavit of personal service, or the return receipt card, or other postal receipt, for certified mailing;

If the proposed coalbed methane well will be located within one-half (1/2) of a mile, measuring horizontally, of a water supply well being used for residential or domestic purposes, the applicant will submit the groundwater protection plan required under KRS

224.70-110

and applicable administrative regulations promulgated pursuant thereto for review by the department, or demonstrate to the department that a plan is not required; and

Proof that the applicant has public liability insurance coverage in an amount not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in aggregate and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per occurrence for damages to persons and property caused by the applicant’s operations or proof that the applicant has satisfied self-insurance requirements as provided by administrative regulations which shall be promulgated by the department.

Prior to the department’s issuance of a permit to drill a coalbed methane well, a copy of the written authorization from the mine licensee shall be filed with the application under the following circumstances:

If the proposed coalbed methane well is to penetrate a workable coalbed that is within the permitted area of an existing permit or the proposed permitted area of a permit pending before the division and if the applicant plans to stimulate, complete, or horizontally drill the coalbed methane well in a workable coalbed that is within the permitted area of an existing permit or the proposed permitted area of a permit pending before the division;

If the proposed coalbed methane well is to be located within a surface area permitted under an existing permit, or the proposed permitted area of a permit pending before the division for which no bond release has been obtained; or

If the proposed coalbed methane well is to be located within a surface area permitted under an existing permit by the division for which a partial bond release has been obtained.

If a coalbed methane well permit is issued for a well site located within the boundaries of any coal mine for which a permit has been issued or is pending pursuant to KRS Chapter 350, the permit shall include a provision specifically stating that the permitted coalbed methane well location is in an area for which a coal mine permit has been issued or is pending pursuant to KRS Chapter 350 and is subject to the mine-through rights set forth in KRS 349.030(1).

If a partial bond release for the surface area on which the proposed coalbed methane well is located has been obtained from the division and the applicant is denied written authorization from the mine licensee, the applicant may file an appeal with the review board requesting approval to drill the proposed coalbed methane well. When requesting an appeal, the applicant shall submit a verified statement including the following:

The applicant has met and conferred with or offered to meet and confer with the mine licensee concerning the authorization;

The mine licensee has refused to provide written authorization to disturb the permitted area;

The physical area to be disturbed by the proposed well location and the use of area, including ingress and egress thereto, qualifies as a commercial or industrial postmining land use entitling the mine licensee to a complete bond release for the area to be disturbed by the coalbed methane well operator in accordance with KRS Chapter 350; and

The applicant has agreed to pay the reasonable and actual costs of the permit revision required by the division to affect the incremental bond release for the proposed area to be disturbed by the coalbed methane well operator, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Prior to the issuance of a permit to drill a coalbed methane well, the applicant shall grant assignable subsidence waivers to any mine licensee if requested in an objection filed pursuant to KRS

349.060

and, if required, to allow present or future mining with planned subsidence under KRS Chapter 350. However, this subsection and any subsidence waivers shall in no way waive, affect, or impair the ability of the applicant or the applicant’s successors or assigns to pursue any remedies for damages to persons, or to improved or tangible property, suffered or incurred as a result of any subsidence caused by the mine licensee or the mine licensee’s successors or assigns. The mine licensee, its successors or assigns, shall be liable for any and all damages to persons or to improved or tangible property proximately caused by the mine licensee.

If the mine licensee is mining in a coal seam that is not being produced by the coalbed methane well operator and has not exercised his or her mine-through rights, as set forth in KRS 349.030(1) or (2), in any coal mine before removing any coal or other material or driving any entry or passageway within five hundred (500) horizontal feet of the vertical segment of a coalbed methane well or within fifty (50) vertical feet of the horizontal segment of a coalbed methane well, the mine licensee shall forward simultaneously to the well operator and to the department, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by registered mail, a copy of the maps and plans required by law to be filed and kept up to date. Maps or plans shall show the mine workings and projected mine workings within five hundred (500) horizontal feet of the coalbed methane well. However, the issuance of any coalbed methane well permit shall not preclude or prevent coal mining outside two hundred (200) feet, but not closer than fifty (50) feet, of the vertical segment of a coalbed methane well or outside of the workable coalbed in which the horizontal segment of a coalbed methane well is located, unless specified by the department for reasons of mine or well safety. The mine licensee shall not mine within fifty (50) feet of the vertical segment of a coalbed methane well without the written authorization of the coalbed methane well operator. A mine licensee may file a request with the department to mine closer than two hundred (200) feet of the vertical segment of the coalbed methane well. The mine licensee shall forward simultaneously to the well operator and the department, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by registered mail, a request to mine closer than two hundred (200) feet, but not closer than fifty (50) feet, of the vertical segment of the coalbed methane well, which shall be accompanied by the following:

A copy of the maps and plans required by law to be filed and kept up to date, showing on the copy of the map or plan its mine plan workings and projected mine workings beneath the tract of land and within two hundred (200) feet, but not closer than fifty (50) feet, of the vertical segment of the coalbed methane well; and

A statement that the applicant has met and conferred with, or offered to meet and confer with, the well operator concerning the mine licensee’s plan to mine closer than two hundred (200) feet, but not closer than fifty (50) feet, of the vertical segment of the coalbed methane well.

The well operator may, within twenty (20) days of receipt of the documents listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, file specific objections in writing with the department. When objections are filed, the department shall provide a copy of the objections to the mine licensee and fix a time and place for an informal hearing. The hearing shall be held not more than ten (10) days from the end of the twenty (20) day period. At the hearing, the mine licensee and the well operator, in person or by representative, shall consider the objections and seek agreement on the character and the extent of operations to be conducted within less than two hundred (200) feet, but not closer than fifty (50) feet, of the vertical segment of the coalbed methane well. If no agreement can be reached, the department, after administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, shall make a decision defining what coal, if any, is necessary to be left for the safe protection, use, and operation of the well. The department’s decision shall be subject to appeal by either party as provided in this chapter. The department shall keep a complete record of all hearings. The mine licensee shall, every six (6) months, while mining within two hundred (200) feet, but not closer than fifty (50) feet, of the vertical segment of the coalbed methane well, file up-to-date maps and plans required by this section, or file new maps and plans complete to date.

The department may deny the issuance of a permit if it determines that the applicant has a documented pattern or practice of substantial violations of the provisions of this chapter and has failed to abate or seek review of the violations. If the department finds that a substantial violation has occurred with respect to existing operations and that the operator has failed to abate or seek review of the violation in the time prescribed, the department may suspend the permit. After a suspension, the operator shall forthwith cease all work being conducted under the permit until the department reinstates the permit. The department shall make a written finding of its determination and may enforce the determination in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS

349.145

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 123, § 47, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 79, § 9, effective June 25, 2009.

349.045.
Voluntary pooling agreements.

When two (2) or more separately owned tracts, or portions thereof, are embraced within a drilling unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or part of any such drilling unit, the operators or owners of coalbed methane owning the interests may pool their interests for the development and operation of the drilling unit by voluntary agreement. These agreements may be based on the exercise of pooling rights or rights to establish units which are granted in any gas or oil lease, coal lease, coalbed methane lease, or similar instrument.

No voluntary pooling agreement between or among coalbed methane operators or owners shall be held to violate the statutory or common law of the Commonwealth which prohibits monopolies or acts, arrangements, contracts, combinations, or conspiracies in restraint of trade or commerce.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 9, effective July 13, 2004.

349.050.
Requirements and procedures for stimulating workable coal seam — Contents and construction of agreements to stimulate — Request for hearing — Liability of well operator.

If any coal interest holder has objected to the proposed stimulation pursuant to KRS 349.020(1), no permit shall be issued to stimulate a coalbed methane well unless the applicant has obtained and filed with the department an agreement between the coal interest holders of any workable coalbed within five hundred (500) horizontal feet of the proposed coalbed methane well to be stimulated and within the five hundred (500) foot horizontal radius and fifty (50) vertical feet above or below the workable coalbed proposed to be stimulated.

The requirement for an agreement to stimulate in this section shall not be construed to impair, abridge, or affect any contractual rights or obligations arising out of a contract, lease, deed, or similar agreement which provides for the development of coalbed methane and stimulation of workable coalbeds between the applicant and the coal interest holder. The existence of any such contract, lease, deed, or similar document shall constitute a waiver of the requirement to file an agreement to stimulate with the department.

An agreement to stimulate shall provide:

That the coal interest holder has been provided with a copy of the permit application to drill a coalbed methane well and a copy of all plats and documents which may accompany the application; and

That the coal interest holder agrees to the stimulation of the workable coalbed as described in the application.

Subject to KRS 349.020(5), in the absence of the applicant submitting the agreement to stimulate as described herein, the applicant may submit a request for a hearing before the review board accompanied by an affidavit, or verified statement, which shall include the following:

A statement that the coal interest holder has refused to sign a written agreement to stimulate the workable coalbed;

A statement detailing the efforts undertaken to obtain the signed agreement to stimulate; and

A statement that the proposed method of stimulation does not involve the use of explosives and will not have a significant adverse affect on the mineability of the workable coalbed, or impair mine safety.

The failure to obtain an agreement to stimulate shall in no way create an inference or presumption that the method of stimulation proposed by the applicant will harm the workable coalbed.

Upon receipt of a request for a hearing and an affidavit, or verified statement, as set forth in this section, the department shall forward the application to the review board to consider the proposed stimulation, or if other objections or requests are filed requiring a hearing before the review board, the request may be included for consideration by the review board along with other matters related to the permit application.

Any well operator that stimulates a workable coalbed without an agreement to stimulate from the coal interest holder shall be liable in tort without proof of negligence for any damages proximately caused by the stimulation to the workable coalbed, or any other workable coalbed within five hundred (500) horizontal feet of the coalbed methane well stimulated or within the five hundred (500) foot horizontal radius and fifty (50) vertical feet above or below the workable coalbed stimulated and for damages to any mining equipment proximately caused by the stimulation. The well operator shall be liable for injury, death, or damage to property proximately caused by the stimulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 10, effective July 13, 2004.

349.055.
Coalbed Methane Well Review Board established — Board attached to Department of Natural Resources within Energy and Environment Cabinet.

The Coalbed Methane Well Review Board is hereby established. The review board shall be composed of five (5) members and shall have the powers and duties specified under this chapter.

The review board shall consist of the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or his or her designee within the department, the director of the Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement and the director of the Division of Oil and Gas within the Department for Natural Resources, a representative of the oil and gas industry, and a representative of the coal industry. The representatives from the oil and gas industry and the coal industry shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four (4) years subject to confirmation by the Senate.

The review board shall be, for administrative purposes only, attached to the Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 11, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 123, § 48, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 1872, effective July 15, 2010.

349.060.
Powers and duties of Coalbed Methane Well Review Board — Promulgation of administrative regulations.

The review board shall rule upon:

Objections to proposed coalbed methane wells, their locations, the proposed stimulation, or the proposed completion pursuant to KRS

349.020

;

Appeals of permit denials arising under KRS

349.020

(5);

Requests for a hearing arising under KRS 349.025(3);

Requests for pooling orders pursuant to KRS 349.080(1);

Requests for the establishment or modification of drilling units for coalbed methane wells;

Requests for the creation or modification of field rules relating to the drilling, completion, and production of coalbed methane wells; and

Requests for the unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools, or fields.

The review board shall meet, hold conferences, and hold hearings at a time and place as designated by the chairman. The chairman may call a meeting of the review board at any time. A majority of the members of the review board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business to come before the review board. All determinations of the review board shall be by majority vote of the quorum present. The commissioner, or his or her designee within the department, shall be the chairman of the review board. The review board shall hold a regular monthly meeting. Notice of all meetings of the review board shall be given to each member by the chairman at least ten (10) days in advance of each meeting, unless otherwise agreed by the members.

The review board shall execute, carry out, administer, and enforce the provisions of this chapter in the manner provided in this section.

The review board may:

Take evidence and issue orders concerning the permitting of a coalbed methane well, its location, stimulation, and the completion pursuant to KRS

349.015

; issue pooling orders in accordance with KRS 349.080(1); issue orders regarding the establishment or modification of drilling units for coalbed methane wells, field rules relating to the drilling, completion, and production of coalbed methane wells; and requests for the unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools, and fields;

Promulgate and enforce administrative regulations and rules necessary to govern the practice and procedure before the review board;

Make relevant investigations of records and facilities as it deems proper in connection with ruling on any objections to a proposed coalbed methane well, its location, the proposed stimulation, or the proposed completion; and

Issue subpoenas for the attendance and sworn testimony from witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the production of any books, records, maps, charts, diagrams, electronic data, and other pertinent documents or data in the review board’s own name or at the request of any party.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 12, effective July 13, 2004.

349.065.
Authority of Coalbed Methane Well Review Board to hear and rule upon appeals of actions of the Department of Natural Resources — Hearings.

The department shall notify the review board of the objection, request, or appeal as set forth in KRS 349.060(1) and schedule a time and place for a hearing.

Notice of the hearing shall be given not less than fifteen (15) days in advance of the hearing to the applicant, surface owners, and all other parties as required under KRS

349.020

,

349.070

, or

349.085

, as applicable. The hearing of the review board shall be held within thirty (30) days after the filing of the objection, request, or appeal or as soon thereafter as the review board can be assembled.

All proceedings before the review board shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

With respect to any objection filed pursuant to KRS

349.015

concerning the proposed coalbed methane well, or its location, stimulation or completion, appeals arising under KRS 349.020(5), or requests for a hearing arising under this chapter, the review board shall make a determination as to whether a permit shall be issued by the department and any conditions to be included within the permit, which determination and order shall be consistent with the intent and purposes of KRS Chapters 350 and 352 and this chapter, taking into consideration the following factors that it considers applicable in the particular proceeding:

The declaration of public policy and legislative findings as set forth in this chapter;

Whether the proposed coalbed methane well can be drilled safely, taking into consideration the dangers from creeps, squeezes, or other disturbances due to the extraction of coal;

The feasibility of moving the proposed drilling location to another location;

Whether any stimulation of the workable coalbed will have a significant adverse affect on the mineability of that workable coalbed or any other workable coalbeds within five hundred (500) feet of the proposed coalbed methane well to be stimulated or within the five hundred (500) foot horizontal radius and fifty (50) vertical feet above or below the workable coalbed proposed to be stimulated or impair mine safety;

Whether the drilling location is above or in close proximity to any mine opening, shaft, entry, travelway, airway, haulageway, drainageway or passageway, or to any proposed extension thereof, any abandoned, operating coal mine or any coal mine already surveyed and platted but not yet being operated;

Whether the proposed drilling can reasonably be done through an existing or planned pillar of coal, or in close proximity to an existing or planned pillar of coal, taking into consideration the surface topography;

The extent to which the proposed drilling location interferes with the safe recovery of coal or coalbed methane;

The extent to which the proposed drilling location will unreasonably interfere with present or future coal mining operations;

The technology and methods proposed for the safe and efficient recovery of coal and coalbed methane;

The practicality of locating the coalbed methane well out of a uniform pattern with other wells;

The surface topography and use; and

Any other factor the review board determines would be considered consistent with KRS Chapters 350 and 352 and this chapter.

Upon consideration of the matters raised at the hearing, the review board shall render a decision based upon the ability to mine any affected workable coalbed safely and the protection of any workable coalbed for safe future mining, shall enter a written order containing findings of fact and conclusions which address any relevant considerations in subsection (4) of this section, and based thereon shall issue and file with the department a written order directing it to:

Refuse to issue a coalbed methane well permit;

Issue a permit for the proposed coalbed methane well location and any conditions to be included within the permit;

Issue a coalbed methane well permit and any conditions to be included within the permit for an alternate drilling location different from that requested by the applicant; or

Issue a permit authorizing the applicant to stimulate the coalbed methane well in the absence of an agreement of the affected coal interest holders as described in KRS 349.045(1), as proposed or as modified by the order of the review board.

With respect to any request for a hearing pursuant to KRS

349.025

by a coalbed interest holder, or any record oil or gas lessor or lessee of any tract being penetrated by a coalbed methane well, to determine whether the well has been abandoned and should be plugged in accordance with this chapter, the review board shall make a determination as to whether the coalbed methane well should be plugged, which determination and order shall be consistent with the intent and purposes of KRS Chapters 350 and 352 and this chapter, taking into consideration the following factors that it considers applicable in the particular proceeding:

Whether the coalbed methane well has ceased to produce in paying quantities, and no dewatering operations are being conducted, for a period of fifteen (15) consecutive months;

Whether the coalbed methane well is being temporarily shut in by the coalbed methane well operator; and

Any other factor the review board determines should be considered consistent with this section.

Upon consideration of the matters raised at the hearing, the review board shall render a decision based upon whether the coalbed methane well has been abandoned and should be plugged in accordance with this chapter; shall enter a written order containing findings of fact and conclusions which address any relevant consideration in subsection (6) of this section based thereon; and shall issue and file with the department a written order directing the department to:

Require the coalbed methane well operator to plug and abandon the well;

Allow the coalbed methane well operator to continue to operate and produce the well; or

Allow the coalbed methane well operator to continue to shut in the coalbed methane well on a temporary basis.

Upon receipt of the review board order, the department shall promptly undertake the action directed by the review board, provided that all other provisions of this chapter have been complied with.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 13, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/2004). When this statute was enacted (2004 Ky. Acts ch. 65, sec. 13), the word “feet” should have been included after the phrase “five hundred (500)” in subsection (4)(d) of this section. This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

.

349.070.
Powers of Coalbed Methane Well Review Board to take actions necessary to prevent waste and protect rights of owners — Objections by holders, lessors, and lessees — Hearings.

In order to prevent the waste of coalbed methane or to protect the correlative rights of the owners of coalbed methane, the review board on its own motion or upon application of an operator of a coalbed methane well or owner of coalbed methane shall have the power to establish or modify drilling units, establish or modify field rules, or unitize coalbed methane wells, pools or fields. Drilling units, to the extent reasonably possible, shall be of uniform shape and size for an entire pool or field. Any operator of a coalbed methane well or owner of coalbed methane may apply to the review board for the creation or modification of drilling units, the establishment or modification of field rules for a pool or field, and the unitization of any coalbed methane wells, pools, or fields.

With respect to any request for the creation or modification of drilling units, establishment or modification of field rules for the pool or field, and the unitization of any coalbed methane wells, pools, or fields, the review board shall grant or deny the request and issue an order consistent with the intent and purposes of KRS Chapters 350 and 352 and this chapter, taking into consideration the following factors that it considers applicable in the particular proceedings:

The area which may be drained efficiently and economically by the proposed coalbed methane well or wells and the spacing requirements of KRS

349.075

;

The plan of development for the coal, that drilling units conform to mine development plans, and the need for proper ventilation of any mines or degasification of any affected coal seams;

The nature and character of any coal seam or seams which will be affected by the coalbed methane well or wells;

The surface topography and mineral boundaries of the lands underlaid by the coal seams to be included in the unit;

Evidence relevant to the proper boundary of the drilling unit;

The nature and extent of ownership of each coalbed methane owner or claimant and whether conflicting claims exist;

Whether the applicant for the drilling unit proposes to be the operator of the coalbed methane well within the drilling unit; and if so, whether the applicant has a lease or other agreement from the owners or claimants of a majority interest in the proposed drilling unit;

Whether a disagreement exists among the coalbed methane owners or claimants over the designation of the operator for any coalbed methane well within the drilling unit; and if so, relevant evidence to determine which operator can properly and efficiently develop the coalbed methane within the drilling unit for the benefit of the majority of the coalbed methane owners;

If more than one person is interested in operating a coalbed methane well within the drilling unit, the estimated cost of submitting by each such person for drilling, completing, operating and marketing the coalbed methane from any proposed coalbed methane well or wells;

Any other available geological or scientific data pertaining to the pool which is proposed to be developed;

The correlative rights of the operators and owners of coalbed methane, so that each operator and owner may obtain his or her just and equitable share of production from the coalbed methane; and

Any other factor the review board determines should be considered consistent with KRS Chapters 350 and 352, and this chapter.

Upon consideration of the matters raised at the hearing, the review board shall render a decision based upon whether to establish or modify a drilling unit, establish or modify field rules or establish or modify the unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools or fields. The review board shall enter a written order containing findings of fact and conclusions which address any relevant considerations in subsection (2) of this section and based thereon shall issue and file with the department a written order:

Establishing or modifying a drilling unit, field rules or unitizing coalbed methane wells, pools or fields;

Refusing to establish or modify a drilling unit, field rules or unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools or fields; or

Attaching certain conditions to the establishment or modification of a drilling unit, field rules, or unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools or fields.

In establishing or modifying a drilling unit for coalbed methane wells, and in order to accommodate the unique characteristics of coalbed methane development, the review board may require that drilling units conform to the mine development plan, if any. If requested by the coal interest holder, well locations and spacing shall correspond with mine operations, including the drilling of multiple coalbed methane wells on the same surface location of each drilling unit.

If an order to establish or modify a drilling unit, field rules or unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools or fields will allow a coalbed methane well to be drilled into or through a workable coalbed, any coal interest holder and any record oil and gas lessor and lessee within the area to be covered by the drilling unit, field rules or unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools or fields may object to the establishment or modification of the drilling unit, field rules or unitization of coalbed methane wells, pools or fields.

The review board may continue a hearing to allow for further investigation and the gathering and taking of additional data and evidence. If at any time during a hearing there is not sufficient evidence for the review board to determine field boundaries, or drilling unit size or shape, the review board may enter a temporary order establishing provisional drilling units, and field boundaries for the orderly development of the pool or field, pending receipt of the information necessary to determine the ultimate pool or field boundaries, and spacing of wells for the pool or field. Upon additional findings of fact, the boundaries of a pool or field and drilling units for the pool or field may be modified by the review board.

Unless otherwise provided for by the review board, after an application for a hearing to establish or modify drilling units or pool boundaries has been filed, no additional wells shall be permitted in the pool or field until the review board’s order establishing or modifying the pool or field or unit has been entered.

After the review board issues a field or pool spacing order which creates drilling units or a pattern of drilling units for a pool or field, should an operator or owner of coalbed methane apply for a permit or otherwise indicate a desire to drill a coalbed methane well outside of such drilling units or pattern of drilling units and thereby potentially extend the pool or field, the review board may, on its own motion or the motion of any interested person, require that the coalbed methane well be located and drilled in compliance with the provisions of the order affecting the pool or field.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 14, effective July 13, 2004.

349.075.
Spacing requirements for vertical and horizontal coalbed methane wells.

Except as provided in KRS

349.070

, or pursuant to voluntary pooling, no permit shall be issued for a coalbed methane well unless the proposed location of a vertical well shall be at least seven hundred fifty (750) feet horizontally from the nearest mineral boundary upon which the well is to be drilled and the proposed location shall be at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet horizontally from the nearest coalbed methane well, unless the department orders that a different spacing distance shall apply. Spacing distances for coalbed methane horizontal wells shall be separately established by the department pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 15, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/2004). When this statute was enacted (2004 Ky. Acts ch. 65, sec. 15), the word “subchapter” was erroneously included in the last sentence of the section. KRS Chapter 349, which was created in this bill, is not divided into subchapters. This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by changing the word “subchapter” to “chapter” by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

.